Massachusetts, session 194th, S1212.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 221 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking Section 70A and replacing it with the following language:-
“Section 70A. Court officers and those authorized to act as court officers within the
judicial branch may perform police duties and have police powers in or about the areas of the
court to which they have been assigned or on the grounds adjacent to the court, including court
parking lots, when so designated by the chief justice of the trial court, the chief justice of the
supreme judicial court or the chief justice of the appeals court as appropriate. Said court officers
and those authorized to act as court officer shall also have police powers when attending a court
proceeding convened in a location other than the courthouse, when escorting jurors on court
of 2

business, when escorting a judicial officer, or when participating in the care, custody or transport
of detainees.”
of 2